Hawaii statutes.
§804-11 One surety sufficient; when. A
single surety is sufficient, if the surety offers cash, a credit or debit card
authorization, stocks, bonds, or real property in accordance with section
804-11.5; otherwise, there shall be two or more sureties. [PC 1869, c 50, §9;
RL 1925, §3987; RL 1935, §5441; RL 1945, §10741; RL 1955, §256-11; HRS §709-11;
ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1987, c 139, §6; am L 2004, c 71,
§2]

Case Notes

Property ownership requirement not applicable to surety company.
26 H. 236 (1922).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next